Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-415
Officer of consolidated county; legal advisor.

For the purpose of securing necessary legal advice and legal services, the officer of consolidated counties shall be entitled to call upon the county attorney in the county who would have been obligated to provide such advice and services in the particular situation if there were a county officer rather than a consolidated county officer.

Laws 1969, c. 139, § 8, p. 640.